Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5033.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 5a. (1) Except as provided in this section, this act does
not apply to 1-story school buildings, to 1-story additions to
GSS H04534'25 (H-1) gbodhc


school buildings, or to the construction , reconstruction, or
remodeling of a school building if the total cost of construction,
reconstruction, or remodeling is less than $15,000.00.$500,000.00.
(2) Section 1(1)(a) 1(1) applies to the construction of all
school buildings and additions to school buildings regardless of
the number of stories of the buildings or additions if the total
cost of construction exceeds $15,000.00.$500,000.00.
(3) Section 1(1)(d) applies to the construction of all school
buildings and additions to school buildings of 1 or more stories
regardless of the cost of construction.
(3) (4) This act applies to the reconstruction of a school
building destroyed or partially destroyed by fire, windstorm, or
other catastrophe if more than 50% of the entire building is
destroyed. The bureau of fire services created in section 1b of the
fire prevention code, 1941 PA 207, MCL 29.1b, acting jointly with
the superintendent of public instruction, may require that the
damaged portion or the remaining portion of the building, or both,
be remodeled or reconstructed in accordance with this act.
(4) (5) This act applies to the remodeling of existing school
buildings and other buildings to be used for school purposes.
(5) (6) An existing building or part of an existing building,
regardless of the number of stories or the cost to the school
district of the building, that has not been used as a school
building shall must not be used as a school building unless it the
use of the existing building or part of the existing building as a
school building is approved by the superintendent of public
instruction and the bureau of fire services.
(6) (7) If the construction, reconstruction, or remodeling of
a school building costs less than $15,000.00, $500,000.00, it is
GSS H04534'25 (H-1) gbodhc


not necessary to employ a registered architect or engineer, but the
plans for the building must be submitted to the bureau of fire
services and to the superintendent of public instruction or the
superintendent's authorized agent for criticism, suggestions, and
approval.
(7) (8) A temporary door locking device or system, as
described in section 1d, may be installed in any school building or
addition to a school building, regardless of the number of stories
of the building or addition, or as a component in the construction,
reconstruction, or remodeling of a school building or addition to a
school building regardless of the costs of that construction,
reconstruction, or remodeling.
(8) Beginning January 1, 2027, and each year thereafter, the
department shall adjust the monetary thresholds under subsections
(1), (2), and (6) by an amount determined by the state treasurer to
reflect the cumulative annual percentage change in the Consumer
Price Index. As used in this subsection "Consumer Price Index"
means the annual average Consumer Price Index for All Urban
Consumers (CPI-U), all items in U.S. city average, reported by the
Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor
or its successor or, if the index is discontinued, an equivalent
index reported by a federal authority. If no such index is
reported, Consumer Price Index means the substitute index chosen by
the state treasurer.
Final Page
GSS H04534'25 (H-1) gbodhc